Alaska statutes. Title 1. General Provisions.
Chapter 05. Alaska Statutes.

Collateral references. —

73 Am. Jur. 2d, Statutes, § 1 et seq.

82 C.J.S., Statutes, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 01.05.006.
Adoption of Alaska Statutes; notes, headings, and references not law.

The bulk formal revision of the laws of Alaska which was authorized by AS

24.20.070

and prepared under the direction of the Alaska Legislative Council and published by The Michie Company, legal publishers, of Charlottesville, Virginia, and titled “Alaska Statutes,” as set out in the 47 titles of the Alaska Statutes, but not including the table of contents, indexes, citations to Alaska Compiled Laws Annotated, 1949, and session laws, chapter, article, section, subsection, and paragraph headings, annotations, collateral references, notes, and decisions, is adopted and enacted as the general and permanent law of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1963)

Cross references. —

For exception to provision that section headings are not a part of the law, see AS

45.01.117

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 1, SLA 1963, repealed all general and permanent laws enacted by the territorial and state legislatures before the convening of the regular session of the Third State Legislature on January 28, 1963.

Sec. 01.05.010.
Adoption of revision. [Repealed, § 2 ch 1 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 01.05.011.
Designation and citation.

The bulk formal revision of Alaska law adopted and enacted into law by
AS

01.05.006

and as amended and supplemented is known as the “Alaska Statutes” and may be cited “AS” followed by the number of the title, chapter, and section, separated by periods. For example, this title may be cited “AS 01”; this chapter may be cited “
AS 01.05”; this section may be cited “
AS

01.05.011

.”
Except as otherwise indicated by the context, citations in accordance with this section include amendments and reenactments of the provision cited.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Sec. 01.05.016.
Effect of adoption.

The adoption and enactment of the Alaska Statutes do not repeal, affect, or modify

a special, local, or temporary law;

a law making an appropriation;

a law affecting a bond issue or by which a bond issue may have been authorized;

the running of the statutes of limitations in force at the time the Alaska Statutes become effective;

the continued existence and operation of a department, agency, or office legally established or held;

a bond of a public officer;

a tax, fee, assessment, or other charge incurred or imposed;

a statute authorizing, ratifying, confirming, approving, or accepting a compact or contract with another state or with the United States or an agency or instrumentality of them.

All laws, rights, and obligations set out in (a) of this section continue to exist in all respects as if the Alaska Statutes had not been adopted and enacted.

In addition to their general application, the provisions of AS 01.10, as far as applicable, apply to this chapter, which enacts the Alaska Statutes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1963)

Sec. 01.05.020.
Prima facie evidence. [Repealed, § 2 ch 1 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 01.05.021.
Effect of repeal on prior offenses and punishments.

No fine, forfeiture, or penalty incurred under laws existing before the time the Alaska Statutes take effect is affected by repeal of the existing law, but the recovery of the fines and forfeitures and the enforcement of the penalties are effected as if the law repealed had still remained in effect.

In the case of an offense committed before the time the Alaska Statutes take effect, the offender is punished under the law in effect when the offense was committed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1963)

Sec. 01.05.026.
Supplements and pamphlets prima facie evidence of law; temporary and special acts; authentication.

The laws contained in the most recent cumulative supplement to and replacement pamphlets for the Alaska Statutes constitute prima facie a part of the Alaska Statutes, and the laws contained in the Temporary and Special Act pamphlets constitute prima facie the temporary and special law of Alaska, when prepared in accordance with this chapter and authenticated by the lieutenant governor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 1971)

Sec. 01.05.030.
Citing, amending, or repealing. [Repealed, § 2 ch 1 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 01.05.031.
Revision of statutes.

Subject to the general policies that may be adopted by the legislative council for the preparation and publication of the annual cumulative supplement to and replacement pamphlets for the Alaska Statutes and of the accompanying Temporary and Special Act pamphlets, the revisor of statutes shall revise for consolidation into the Alaska Statutes and the accompanying pamphlets all laws of a general and permanent nature and all laws of a temporary or special nature enacted by the legislature.

The revisor shall edit and revise the laws for consolidation without changing the meaning of any law in the following manner:

renumber sections, parts of sections, articles, chapters, and titles;

change the wording of section or subsection titles, or delete subsection titles, and change or provide new titles for articles, chapters, and titles;

change capitalization for the purpose of uniformity;

substitute the proper designation for the terms “the preceding section,” “this Act,” and like terms;

substitute the proper calendar date for “effective date of this Act,” “date of passage of this Act,” and other phrases of similar import;

strike out figures if they are merely a repetition of written words or vice versa, or substitute figures for written words or vice versa for the purpose of uniformity;

correct manifest errors that are clerical, typographical, or errors in spelling, or errors by way of additions or omissions;

correct manifest errors in references to laws;

rearrange sections, combine sections or parts of sections with other sections or parts of sections, divide long sections into two or more sections, and rearrange the order of sections to conform to a logical arrangement of subject matter as may most generally be followed in the Alaska Statutes;

change all sections, when possible, to read in the present tense, indicative mood, active voice and if the use of personal pronouns cannot be avoided in a section change the section to read in the third person, and singular number, or any other necessary grammatical change in the manner generally followed in the Alaska Statutes;

delete or change sections or parts of sections if a deletion or change is necessary because of other legislative amendments that did not specifically amend or repeal them;

omit all temporary laws, all titles to acts, all enacting and repealing clauses, all declarations of emergency, and all purpose, validity, and construction clauses unless, from their nature, it may be necessary to retain some of them to preserve the full meaning and intent of the law.

The revisor shall edit and revise the laws as they are enacted by the legislature, without changing the meaning of any law, so as to avoid the use of pronouns denoting masculine or feminine gender.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 32 SLA 1971; am §§ 1, 2 ch 58 SLA 1982)

Sec. 01.05.036.
Improvement of statutes.

The Legislative Affairs Agency, working in cooperation with the revisor, shall make recommendations to the legislative council concerning deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions in and the need for reorganization or revision of the statutes, and, at the direction of the legislative council, shall prepare for submission to the legislature legislation for the correction or removal of the deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions, or to otherwise improve the form or substance of any portion of the statute law of this state.
Each title of the Alaska Statutes shall be systematically reviewed at least once each two years for deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 1 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 1974)

Cross references. —

For the responsibility of the Alaska Legislative Council for statute revision, see AS

24.20.070

.